Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2875.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAKE SUPERIOR COMMUNITY HEALTH AND WELLNESS CENTER.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Lake Superior Community Health Center to predesign and design a regional, multipurpose health and wellness center to be located in western Duluth to serve as a community center and resource hub for health and wellness programming and services. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end